District of Columbia statutes.
22-401

Assault with intent to kill, rob, or poison, or to commit first degree sexual abuse, second degree sexual abuse or child sexual abuse.

Every person convicted of any assault with intent to kill or to commit first degree sexual abuse, second degree sexual abuse, or child sexual abuse, or to commit robbery, or mingling poison with food, drink, or medicine with intent to kill, or wilfully poisoning any well, spring, or cistern of water, shall be sentenced to imprisonment for not less than 2 years or more than 15 years. In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1321, ch. 854, § 803
Dec. 27, 1967, 81 Stat. 736, Pub. L. 90-226, title VI, § 601
May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 401(b)(2), 42 DCR 53
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 303(d), 60 DCR 2064
Additional penalty for possession of firearm, see § 22-4502.
Consent defense to sexual abuse, see § 22-3007.
Indeterminate sentences, minimum sentences, specific crimes, see § 24-403.
Minimum sentence when previously convicted of crime of violence, see § 24-403.
Sentencing, supervised release, and good time credit for felonies committed on or after August 5, 2000, see § 24-403.01.
Sexually violent offense defined, see § 22-4101.
This section is referenced in § 5-132.21, § 11-502, § 22-3007, § 22-3152, § 22-4001, § 24-112, § 24-403, and § 24-403.01.
1981 Ed., § 22-501.
1973 Ed., § 22-501.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303(d) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.